Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-121
Nebraska College of Technical Agriculture at Curtis; creation; location; purpose.

For the furtherance and promotion of agriculture and stockraising interests of this state, a technical college of agriculture is hereby established near the town of Curtis in Frontier County, Nebraska. Such college shall be maintained under the conditions prescribed in this section and sections 85-121.03 and 85-121.04 and shall be known as the Nebraska College of Technical Agriculture at Curtis. Such college of agriculture shall be under the control and management of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.

The Nebraska College of Technical Agriculture at Curtis shall be devoted to a statewide mission of instruction relating to food and agriculture at less than the baccalaureate degree, with concentration on the applied associate degree. The program shall be organized to provide expedient response to the changes needed in technical education to serve the agricultural industry of the state.

Laws 1911, c. 138, § 1, p. 449;

R.S.1913, § 7130;

C.S.1922, § 6762;

C.S.1929, § 85-148;

R.S.1943, § 85-121;

Laws 1987, LB 656, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1042, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 62;

Laws 2003, LB 7, § 1.